Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2420
False statement; false identification; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

Any person who, in connection with the purchase, transfer, or attempted purchase of a handgun pursuant to section 69-2410, knowingly and intentionally makes any materially false oral or written statement or knowingly and intentionally furnishes any false identification intended or likely to deceive the licensee shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 102.